Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 2831.
Investigations.

The Fire Marshal and his or her assistants are authorized to investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of every fire within the State that causes injury to any person or that causes damage or loss of property in excess of $200.00. The Fire Marshal and his or her assistants shall make a special investigation of any fire of suspicious origin. In any investigation carried out by the Fire Marshal, he or she shall cooperate with the local fire department.

The chief of a volunteer or paid fire department or his or her designee and, in towns lacking a fire department, the first selectboard member, shall investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of every fire occurring in his or her jurisdiction that causes injury to any person or that causes damage or loss of property in excess of $200.00. He or she may make a special investigation as to whether a fire was the result of carelessness or accident and shall make a special investigation of any fire of suspicious origin.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2832.
Time of investigation; supervision and direction.

An investigation pursuant to section 2831 of this subchapter shall be begun within five days after the occurrence of the fire or as soon thereafter as it appears that there is cause for an investigation. The Fire Marshal or the Deputy Fire Marshal shall have the right to supervise and direct the investigation whenever he or she deems it necessary or expedient.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 174.

§ 2833.
Reports to Fire Marshal.

The chief of a volunteer or paid fire department or, if there is no fire department, the first selectperson of a town, shall within five days of the occurrence of a fire within his or her jurisdiction that causes serious injury to any person or loss or damage to property that exceeds $200.00 forward a report of the fire to the State Fire Marshal on forms provided by the Fire Marshal. If the reporting officer has reason to believe that a fire is of suspicious origin, he or she shall report that fact to the State Fire Marshal immediately. No fee shall be paid or allowed any officer for rendering the report required by this subsection.

An officer referred to in subsection (a) of this section who intentionally neglects to comply with any of the requirements of this subchapter shall be fined not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2021, No. 20

, § 175.

§ 2834.
Repealed.
1973, No. 137 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 2835.
Superior judge.

If a selectperson of a town or a mayor of a city is informed that a building, pile of wood, lumber, or bark, or any other property in the municipality, has been intentionally and maliciously set on fire or burned, a majority of the selectboard, or the mayor, may apply to a Superior judge, who shall inquire into the cause of the fire and the manner in which it was set and the property burned.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 73, eff. April 9, 1974;

2021, No. 20

, § 176.

§ 2836.
Inquiry and return.

Such magistrate shall make such inquiry and return as is provided in the case of inquest on the dead and the expenses thereof and the fees shall be paid in the same manner.